Washington statutes.
RCW 1.60.010

Medal of valor.

There is established a decoration of the state medal of valor with accompanying certificate, ribbons, and appurtenances for award by the governor, in the name of the state, to any person or group of persons who has or have saved, or attempted to save, the life of another at the risk of serious injury or death to himself or herself, upon the selection of the governor's state medal of valor committee.

[ 2015 c 4 s 1; 2000 c 224 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 4: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 2, 2015]." [ 2015 c 4 s 4.]